Utah statutes.
39-7-115.   Mortgage foreclosures.
(1)  The creditor of a service member who, prior to entry into military
service, has entered into a mortgage contract with the service member or his
dependent for the purchase of real or personal property may not foreclose on
the mortgage or repossess the property for nonpayment or any breach occurring
during military service without an order from a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(2)  The court, upon application to it under this section, may, unless the
court finds on the record that the ability of the service member to comply
with the terms of the mortgage is not materially affected by reason of his
military service:
(a)  order repayment of any prior installments or deposits as a condition of
terminating the contract and resuming possession of the property;
(b)  order a stay of the proceedings on its own motion, or on motion by the
service member or another person on his behalf; or
(c)  make any other disposition of the case as it considers to be equitable to
conserve the interests of all parties.
(3)  In order to come within the provisions of this section, the service
member or dependent shall establish the following:
(a)  that relief is sought on an obligation secured by a mortgage, trust deed,
or other security in the nature of a mortgage on either real or personal
property;
(b)  that the obligation originated prior to the service member's entry into
military service;
(c)  that the property was owned by the service member or his dependent prior
to the commencement of military service; and
(d)  that the property is still owned by the service member or his dependent
at the time relief is sought.
(4)  Any person who knowingly forecloses on property which is the subject of
this section other than as provided in Subsection (1) is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
